Tennessee, session 114, HB2256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-108(b)(5)(E), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(E) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(5)(D), a public charter school authorized by
the commission, and the local board of education of the LEA in which the public charter
school is located, may, within thirty (30) calendar days of the public charter school's
authorization, mutually agree in writing that the local board of education will be the
authorizer and the LEA for the public charter school, and the local board of education
shall assume the rights and responsibilities of the charter agreement. The charter
agreement must be filed with the commission in a manner prescribed by the
commission. This subdivision (b)(5)(E) does not apply to a public charter school that
has had its charter agreement renewed on appeal by the commission; and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-110(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "A charter agreement" and substituting "An initial charter agreement".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-110(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c)
(1) If a public charter school renewal application is approved by a local
board of education, then the term of the renewed charter agreement must be for
ten (10) academic years.
HB2256
011692
- 1 -

(2) If a public charter school renewal application is approved by the
commission, then the term of the renewed charter agreement must be for a term
of no less than five (5) academic years, but no more than ten (10) academic
years, as determined by resolution of the commission.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-121(g), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(g)
(1) If a public charter school renewal application is approved by a local
board of education, then the term of the renewed charter agreement must be for
ten (10) academic years.
(2) If a public charter school renewal application is approved by the
commission, then the term of the renewed charter agreement must be for a term
of no less than five (5) academic years, but no more than ten (10) academic
years, as determined by resolution of the commission.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-121(f)(3), is amended by
deleting "Notwithstanding subsection (g), the first sentence of § 49-13-110(b), and § 49-13-
110(c), if" and substituting "If".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-121(l), is amended by deleting
"Notwithstanding subsection (g), the first sentence of § 49-13-110(b), and § 49-13-110(c), if"
and substituting "If".
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011692